New York, session 2025-2026, S1186.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 19-101.5 to read as follows: 3 § 19-101.5 Notification of schools of construction work. a. No later 4 than fourteen days prior to the commencement of any construction project 5 to be undertaken by the department within three hundred feet of any 6 building operated by the city school district of the city of New York or 7 a nonpublic school or charter school located within the city of New York 8 where such building is used for student instruction, the department 9 shall provide written notice to such school district or such nonpublic 10 school or charter school. Such written notice shall include a 11 description of location of such construction. No written notice shall 12 be required pursuant to this section when the commencement of a 13 construction project is in response to an emergency. 14 b. (i) The term "construction" as used in this section means the 15 erection, building, or substantial acquisition, alteration, recon- 16 struction, improvement, extension or modification, including public 17 utility improvements, of a highway, sidewalk or appurtenance thereof. 18 (ii) The term "emergency" as used in this section means a situation 19 involving danger to life, safety or property which requires immediate EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01915-03-5 S. 1186--A 2 1 action, is essential to efficient operation or the adequate provision of 2 service by a municipality, school district, nonpublic school or the 3 state, and is a direct consequence of an accident or other unforeseen 4 circumstance. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law.